Idaho, session 2025, H0351.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-6001, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-6001. PARENTAL RIGHTS. (1) A student's parent or legal guardian
has the right to reasonable academic accommodation from the child's public
school. "Reasonable academic accommodation" means the school shall make
its best effort to enable parents or and legal guardians to exercise their
rights without substantial impact to staff and resources, including em-
ployee working conditions, safety and supervision on school premises for
school activities, and the efficient allocation of expenditures, while bal-
ancing the parental rights of parents and legal guardians, the educational
needs of other students, the academic and behavioral impacts to a classroom,
a teacher's workload, and the assurance of the safe and efficient operations
of the school.
(2) School districts and the boards of directors of public charter
schools, in consultation with parents, teachers, and administrators, shall
develop and adopt a policy to promote the involvement of parents and legal
guardians of children enrolled in the schools within the school district or
the charter school, including:
(a) A plan for parent participation in the schools that is designed to
improve parent and teacher cooperation in such areas such as homework,
attendance, and discipline;
(b) A process by which parents may learn about the course of study for
their children and review learning materials, including the source of
any supplemental educational materials, any required textbooks, and
any course syllabi. A list of such learning materials shall be pub-
lished on the school district website by October 1 of each school year.
The list shall contain identifying information for all learning ma-
terials, including the titles of required textbooks. Nothing shall
preclude additions or modifications to such list after October 1 of each
year, as needed;
(c) A process by which parents who object to any learning material or
activity on the basis that it harms the child or impairs the parents'
firmly held beliefs, values, or principles may withdraw their child
from the activity, class, or program in which the material is used;


(d) The public school's responsibility for notifying a student's par-
ent or legal guardian regarding known changes in the student's mental,
emotional, or physical health or well-being;
(e) The reinforcement of the fundamental rights and responsibilities
of parents as primary stakeholders to make decisions regarding the up-
bringing and control of the parent's child; and
(f) A process for staff to encourage students to discuss issues related
to the student's well-being with the student's parent or legal guardian
and, if necessary, to facilitate discussion of the issues with the par-
ent or legal guardian.
(3) A policy shall not prohibit parents or legal guardians from ac-
cessing any of their children's education and health records created,
maintained, or used by the public school unless such documentation relates
to physical abuse, abandonment, or neglect by the parent or legal guardian.
Unless a timeline is otherwise delineated in a specific applicable state or
federal law, records shall be provided to the parent or legal guardian within
five (5) school days after a request to access such records is made.
(4) A public school shall not adopt procedures, policies, or student
support forms that prohibit public school personnel from notifying a parent
or legal guardian about a student's mental, emotional, or physical health or
well-being or a change in related services or monitoring or that encourage
or have the effect of encouraging a student to withhold from a parent or le-
gal guardian such information. This subsection does not prohibit a public
school from adopting procedures that permit public school personnel to with-
hold information from a parent or legal guardian if ordered by a court of com-
petent jurisdiction.
(5) At the start of the school year, each public school shall notify
parents and legal guardians of health services offered or made available
through the school or by private organizations, including preventative
health and wellness services, screenings, medication administration, first
aid and emergency care, and appropriate management of all health conditions
with parental consent. Parental consent to any health or wellness service
does not waive parents' or legal guardians' right to access their children's
educational or associated health records or to be notified about their chil-
dren's health status or monitoring as provided in this section.
(6) A public school shall notify a student's parent or legal guardian if
a student has been or may be questioned by a school resource officer or other
law enforcement official, unless the child is a victim or suspected victim
of physical child abuse. School districts and public charter schools shall
develop and adopt policies to ensure compliance with this subsection.
(7) Before any public school employee administers any noncurricu-
lar-related student survey, well-being questionnaire, or health screening
to any student, the employee must first obtain consent from the school's su-
perintendent or designee. If the content of any such survey, questionnaire,
or screening regards an individual student's sexuality, sex, religion,
personal political beliefs, mental or psychological problems, personal fam-
ily information, or individual or family financial information, the public
school shall provide the survey, questionnaire, or screening form to the
student's parent or legal guardian in advance and obtain the permission of
the parent or legal guardian.


(8) A parent or legal guardian of a child enrolled in an Idaho public
school shall have reasonable access to observe all school activities during
school hours in which the child is enrolled, except for those who are oth-
erwise legally prohibited. Observations of individual classrooms during
instructional time shall be permitted with the principal's and teacher's
pre-approval. Visits shall not be permitted if their occurrence, duration,
frequency, or conduct on campus interferes with the delivery of instruction
or disrupts the normal school environment. Nothing in this section shall
prevent a reasonable denial of entry due to emergency or safety drills,
situations outlined in school safety plans, an emergency lockdown, periods
of statewide testing, school officials' enforcement of the provisions of
section 33-512, Idaho Code, or other specific situations enumerated by the
school.
(9) A parent or legal guardian whose rights, as provided by this sec-
tion, are violated by a public school may file a complaint with the school.
Public schools shall implement policies and procedures to accept, evaluate,
and remedy complaints.
(10) If a complaint is not satisfactorily remedied by the public school,
a parent shall have a private cause of action for injunctive relief, damages,
and any other relief available under law against the school.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.